Missouri, session 2026, SB1784.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.016, 137.115, 137.180, 137.355,
138.010, 138.060, 138.135, 138.390, 138.430, 138.434, and
139.031, RSMo, are repealed and thirteen new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.240, 115.706,
137.016, 137.115, 137.180, 137.355, 138.010, 138.060, 138.135,
138.390, 138.430, 138.434, and 139.031, to read as follows:
115.240. The election authority for any political
subdivision or special district shall label ballot measures
relating to property taxation that are submitted by such
political subdivision or special district to a vote of the
people numerically or alphabetically only. No such ballot
measure shall be labeled in a descriptive manner aside from
its numerical or alphabetical designation.
115.706. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, no ballot measure proposing the
imposition, increase, or extension of an ad valorem property
tax by a political subdivision shall be deemed approved
unless a majority of the votes cast on the question are in
favor.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1784 2
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, beginning on January 1, 2027, the ballot language
for a question submitted to voters by a political
subdivision desiring to levy a real property tax or personal
property tax shall include at least the following elements,
as applicable:
(1) The name of the political subdivision imposing the
property tax;
(2) The real property or personal property on which
the property tax will be imposed;
(3) The current tax rate ceiling, the proposed tax
rate ceiling, and, if the political subdivision is seeking
authorization to increase an existing tax, the difference
between the proposed new tax rate ceiling and the current
tax rate ceiling, expressed in percentage changed and the
number of cents per one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation. The percentage change shall be calculated by
subtracting the current tax rate ceiling from the proposed
tax rate ceiling, dividing the result by the current tax
rate ceiling, and multiplying the quotient by one hundred;
(4) The length of time for which the tax will be
imposed or the expiration date of the tax;
(5) The purpose for which the tax will be imposed;
(6) A description of additional actions a political
subdivision affected by the ballot issue will be required to
take;
(7) If the political subdivision is seeking
authorization to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations:
(a) An indication that bonds, notes, or other
obligations will be issued if the proposal is approved;

SB 1784 3
(b) The kind of bonds, notes, or other obligations
that will be issued including, but not limited to, general
obligation bonds or revenue bonds; and
(c) The total amount of such bonds, notes, or other
obligations;
(8) A disclosure that an increase to a tax rate
ceiling could result in a tax rate increase;
(9) A statement indicating the real property or
personal property that will be affected by such tax or tax
rate ceiling increase, containing wording substantially
similar to the following, as applicable:
"If approved, this proposition could increase the
property taxes of:
A residential property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0019) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
A commercial property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0032) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
An agricultural property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0012) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
A motor vehicle ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 10,000 multiplied by 0.00333) per
$10,000 of appraised valuation."
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, no political subdivision or election authority
shall advertise or describe any proposed tax on property in
a political subdivision as not increasing taxes, or any
language to that effect, unless both:

SB 1784 4
(1) Failing to adopt the proposed measure would cause
an actual increase in the tax rate; and
(2) Adopting the proposed measure would cause the tax
rate to stay the same or decrease.
4. The ballot language statements shall fairly and
accurately explain what a vote for and what a vote against
the measure represent. The ballot language shall be true
and impartial statements of the effect of a vote for and
against the measure in language neither intentionally
argumentative nor likely to create prejudice for or against
the proposed measure.
137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of
the Missouri Constitution, the following terms mean:
(1) "Residential property", all real property improved
by a structure which is used or intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants, vacant land in
connection with an airport, land used as a golf course,
manufactured home parks, bed and breakfast inns in which the
owner resides and uses as a primary residence with six or
fewer rooms for rent, and time-share units as defined in
section 407.600, except to the extent such units are
actually rented and subject to sales tax under subdivision
(6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020, but residential
property shall not include other similar facilities used
primarily for transient housing. A single-family home owned
by a sole proprietor, individual, partnership, or limited
liability company that is leased for a term of less than
thirty consecutive days, in whole or in part, subject to
sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section
144.020 shall be classified only as residential property.
For the purposes of this section, "transient housing" means
all rooms available for rent or lease for which the receipts

SB 1784 5
from the rent or lease of such rooms are subject to state
sales tax pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of
section 144.020; the leasing of a single-family home, in
whole or in part, for a term of less than thirty consecutive
days does not in itself constitute "transient housing";
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all
real property used for agricultural purposes and devoted
primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the
feeding, breeding and management of livestock which shall
include breeding, showing, and boarding of horses; to
dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings
and structures customarily associated with farming,
agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include land devoted to
and qualifying for payments or other compensation under a
soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under
an agreement with an agency of the federal government.
Agricultural and horticultural property shall further
include any reliever airport. Real property classified as
forest croplands shall not be agricultural or horticultural
property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and
shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to
implement Section 7 of Article X of the Missouri
Constitution. Agricultural and horticultural property shall
also include any sawmill or planing mill defined in the U.S.
Department of Labor's Standard Industrial Classification
(SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number
2421. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also
include urban and community gardens. For the purposes of
this section, "urban and community gardens" shall include
real property cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or
community for the purposes of providing agricultural

SB 1784 6
products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of
residents of the neighborhood or community, and shall not
include a garden intended for individual or personal use;
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and
other real property", all real property used directly or
indirectly for any commercial, mining, industrial,
manufacturing, trade, professional, business, or similar
purpose, including all property centrally assessed by the
state tax commission but shall not include floating docks,
portions of which are separately owned and the remainder of
which is designated for common ownership and in which no one
person or business entity owns more than five individual
units. All other real property not included in the property
listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of Article
X of the Missouri Constitution, as such property is defined
in this section, shall be deemed to be included in the term
"utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real
property".
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution,
any taxing district may adjust its operating levy to recoup
any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the
surtax imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of
Section 6 of the Constitution, as the result of changing the
classification of structures intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants which contain five or
more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy does not
exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980
tax year. For purposes of this section, loss in revenue
shall include the difference between the revenue that would
have been collected on such property under its
classification prior to enactment of this section and the
amount to be collected under its classification under this

SB 1784 7
section. The county assessor of each county or city not
within a county shall provide information to each taxing
district within its boundaries regarding the difference in
assessed valuation of such property as the result of such
change in classification.
3. All reclassification of property as the result of
changing the classification of structures intended to be
used for residential living by human occupants which contain
five or more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made
after December 31, 1994.
4. Where real property is used or held for use for
more than one purpose and such uses result in different
classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each
classification the percentage of the true value in money of
100 the property devoted to each use; except that, where
101 agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this
102 section, also contains a dwelling unit or units, the farm
103 dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up
104 to five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling
105 shall be residential property, as defined in this section,
106 provided that the portion of property used or held for use
107 as an urban and community garden shall not be residential
108 property. This subsection shall not apply to any reliever
109 airport.
110 5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held
111 for future use; which is used for a private club, a not-for-
112 profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade,
113 service organization, or similar entity; or for which a
114 determination as to its classification cannot be made under
115 the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section,
116 shall be classified according to its immediate most suitable

SB 1784 8
117 economic use, which use shall be determined after
118 consideration of:
119 (1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
120 (2) Location of such property;
121 (3) Zoning classification of such property; except
122 that, such zoning classification shall not be considered
123 conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is
124 determined that such zoning classification does not reflect
125 the immediate most suitable economic use of the property;
126 (4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such
127 property;
128 (5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers,
129 street lighting, and other public services for such property;
130 (6) Size of such property;
131 (7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares;
132 and
133 (8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of
134 the immediate most suitable economic use of such property.
135 6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not,
136 for taxation purposes, be classified as subclass (1),
137 subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes
138 are prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri
139 Constitution and defined in this section, but shall be taxed
140 in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7
141 of Article X of the Missouri Constitution.
137.115. 1. (1) All other laws to the contrary
notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis
shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal
property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
district.

SB 1784 9
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
this section and section 137.078, the assessor shall
annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
first of each calendar year.
(3) The assessor shall annually assess all real
property, including any new construction and improvements to
real property, and possessory interests in real property at
the percent of its true value in money set in subsection 5
of this section. The true value in money of any possessory
interest in real property in subclass (3), where such real
property is on or lies within the ultimate airport boundary
as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14
CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a FAR Part 139
certification and owned by a political subdivision, shall be
the otherwise applicable true value in money of any such
possessory interest in real property, less the total dollar
amount of costs paid by a party, other than the political
subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on
such real property completed after January 1, 2008, and
which are included in the above-mentioned possessory
interest, regardless of the year in which such costs were
incurred or whether such costs were considered in any prior
year. The assessor shall annually assess all real property
in the following manner: new assessed values shall be
determined as of January first of each odd-numbered year and
shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered
year, except for new construction and property improvements
which shall be valued as though they had been completed as
of January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The
assessor may call at the office, place of doing business, or

SB 1784 10
residence of each person required by this chapter to list
property, and require the person to make a correct statement
of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
person or under his or her care, charge or management,
taxable in the county.
(4) On or before January first of each even-numbered
year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a two-year
assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and
the state tax commission for their respective approval or
modification. The county governing body shall approve and
forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the
state tax commission by February first. If the county
governing body fails to forward the plan or its alternative
to the plan to the state tax commission by February first,
the assessor's plan shall be considered approved by the
county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to
approve a plan and if the state tax commission and the
assessor and the governing body of the county involved are
unable to resolve the differences, in order to receive state
cost-share funds outlined in section 137.750, the county or
the assessor shall petition the administrative hearing
commission, by May first, to decide all matters in dispute
regarding the assessment maintenance plan. Upon agreement
of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties
proceed with mediation or arbitration upon terms agreed to
by the parties. The final decision of the administrative
hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in
the circuit court of the county involved.
(5) In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real
property or subclass (3) real property within any county
with a charter form of government, or within a city not
within a county, is made by a computer, computer-assisted

SB 1784 11
method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported
by clear, convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such
valuation, shall be on the assessor at any hearing or
appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves
otherwise, there shall be a presumption that the assessment
was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a
computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall
not be limited to, the following:
[(1)] (a) The findings of the assessor based on an
appraisal of the property by generally accepted appraisal
techniques; and
[(2)] (b) The purchase prices from sales of at least
three comparable properties and the address or location
thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable"
means that:
[(a)] a. Such sale was closed at a date relevant to
the property valuation; and
[(b)] b. Such properties are not more than one mile
from the site of the disputed property, except where no
similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed
property, the nearest comparable property shall be used.
Such property shall be within five hundred square feet in
size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed
property in age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other
relevant characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each
100 constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property
101 and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of

SB 1784 12
102 taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
103 money:
104 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
105 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
106 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
107 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
108 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
109 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
110 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
111 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
112 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per
113 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
114 percent;
115 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
116 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
117 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
118 introducing new product lines or used for making
119 improvements to existing products by any company which is
120 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
121 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
122 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
123 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
124 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
125 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
126 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
127 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
128 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
129 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
130 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank
131 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
132 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to

SB 1784 13
133 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
134 delivered to the assessor.
135 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
136 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
137 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
138 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
139 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
140 percent;
141 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
142 and
143 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
144 percent.
145 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
146 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
147 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real
148 property if the use or purpose of such real property is
149 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
150 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
151 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
152 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
153 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
154 subclassification.
155 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
156 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
157 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
158 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
159 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
160 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
161 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
162 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of
163 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
164 collector may request the county commission to have the

SB 1784 14
165 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
166 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
167 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books
168 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
169 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
170 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
171 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
172 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
173 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
174 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
175 may be considered real property.
176 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered
177 a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement pursuant to
178 section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to
179 be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015
180 and assessed as a realty improvement to the existing real
181 estate parcel.
182 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
183 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
184 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
185 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
186 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
187 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
188 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
189 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
190 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
191 9. The assessor of each county and each city not
192 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
193 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
194 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,
195 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
196 guide of information for determining the true value of motor

SB 1784 15
197 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
198 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
199 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
200 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-
201 in value published in the current October issue of the
202 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
203 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
204 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
205 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
206 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
207 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other
208 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
209 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
210 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
211 such information or publications that, in the assessor's
212 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
213 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
214 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
215 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
216 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
217 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
218 in the previous year.
219 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed
220 valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real property or any
221 parcel of subclass (3) real property by more than fifteen
222 percent since the last assessment, excluding increases due
223 to new construction or improvements, the assessor shall
224 conduct a physical inspection of such property. For any
225 general reassessment of property causing the assessed
226 valuation to increase more than fifteen percent from the
227 previous assessment, except for increase due to new
228 construction or improvement, such increase shall be evenly

SB 1784 16
229 divided between each of the next successive reassessment
230 cycles in a manner that does not cause an increase of more
231 than fifteen percent for any two-year reassessment period.
232 For the purposes of implementing this subsection, the county
233 assessor and collector shall apply a credit to a taxpayer's
234 property tax bill in an amount that causes the taxpayer's
235 real property tax liability to increase by no more than
236 fifteen percent for any two-year reassessment period.
237 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to
238 subsection 10 of this section, the assessor shall notify the
239 property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the
240 owner clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to
241 the physical inspection. If a physical inspection is
242 required, the property owner may request that an interior
243 inspection be performed during the physical inspection. The
244 owner shall have no less than thirty days prior to the
245 physical inspection to notify the assessor of a request for
246 an interior physical inspection.
247 12. A physical inspection[, as] required by subsection
248 10 of this section[,] shall be completed prior to July first
249 of the reassessment year and shall include, but not be
250 limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of
251 all exterior portions of the land and any buildings and
252 improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably
253 and lawfully gain external access, and shall include an
254 observation and review of the interior of any buildings or
255 improvements on the property upon the timely request of the
256 owner pursuant to subsection 11 of this section. Mere
257 observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or the
258 like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a
259 physical inspection as required by this section.

SB 1784 17
260 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards
261 as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax or
262 license due. No county or city collector may charge
263 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
264 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
265 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
266 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
267 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
268 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
269 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.
270 14. Any county or city not within a county in this
271 state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body of
272 such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and
273 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house
274 bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly, second
275 regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
276 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
277 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
278 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
279 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
280 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
281 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
282 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
283 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
284 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
285 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
286 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
287 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a
288 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying
289 the provisions of this subsection, a political subdivision
290 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
291 such counties has opted out and at least one of such

SB 1784 18
292 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
293 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
294 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
295 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
296 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
297 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
298 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
299 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
300 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
301 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
302 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
303 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
304 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative
305 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
306 any year.
307 15. The governing body of any city of the third
308 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
309 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
310 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
311 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
312 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
313 property only if such city bills and collects its own
314 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
315 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
316 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
317 city's tax rate ceiling.
318 16. Any portion of real property that is available as
319 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
320 purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that
321 has not been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be
322 assessed based upon how the real property is currently being
323 used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state

SB 1784 19
324 tax commission, state agency, or political subdivision
325 responsible for the administration of tax policies shall, in
326 the performance of its duties, make available all books,
327 records, and information requested, except such books,
328 records, and information as are by law declared confidential
329 in nature, including individually identifiable information
330 regarding a specific taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property.
331 For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall mean
332 all real property that is in use or readily available as a
333 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
334 purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to
335 others that has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.180. 1. Whenever any assessor shall increase the
valuation of any real property he shall forthwith notify the
record owner of such increase, either in person, or by mail
directed to the last known address; every such increase in
assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to
review by the county board of equalization whereat the
landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to
the landowner shall so state.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, for all counties with a
charter form of government, other than any county adopting a
charter form of government after January 1, 2008, whenever
any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year
of general reassessment, the county shall notify the record
owner of the projected tax liability likely to result from
such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed to
the last known address; every such increase in assessed
valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall

SB 1784 20
be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner
shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
3. For all calendar years prior to the first day of
January of the year following receipt of software necessary
for the implementation of the requirements provided under
subsections 4 and 5 of this section from the state tax
commission, for any county not subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section
137.355, whenever any assessor shall increase the valuation
of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of the previous
assessed value and such increase either in person, or by
mail directed to the last known address and include in such
notice a statement indicating that the change in assessed
value may impact the record owner's tax liability and
provide all processes and deadlines for appealing
determinations of the assessed value of such property. Such
notice shall be provided in a font and format sufficient to
alert a record owner of the potential impact upon tax
liability and the appellate processes available.
4. Effective January first of the year following
receipt of software necessary for the implementation of the
requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 5
of this section from the state tax commission, for all
counties not subject to the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever
any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year
of general reassessment, the county shall notify the record

SB 1784 21
owner of the projected tax liability likely to result from
such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed to
the last known address; every such increase in assessed
valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall
be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner
shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
5. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsections 2 and 4 of this section, from the county
shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property

SB 1784 22
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
6. In addition to the requirements provided under
subsections 1, 2, and 5 of this section, effective January
1, 2011, in any county with a charter form of government and
with more than one million inhabitants, whenever any
assessor shall notify a record owner of any change in
assessed value, such assessor shall provide notice that
information regarding the specific assessment method and the
basis of the computation of value for such property is
available on the assessor's website and provide the exact
website address at which such information may be accessed.
Such notification shall provide the assessor's contact
information to enable taxpayers without internet access to
100 request and receive information regarding the assessment
101 method and computation of value for such property. If any
102 third-party documents, reports, or other data were relied
103 upon by the assessor in the computation of assessed value,
104 the same shall be disclosed to the record owner on the
105 assessor's website.
137.355. 1. If an assessor increases the valuation of
any tangible personal property as estimated in the itemized
list furnished to the assessor, and if an assessor increases
the valuation of any real property, he shall forthwith
notify the record owner of the increase either in person or
by mail directed to the last known address, and if the
address of the owner is unknown notice shall be given by
publication in two newspapers published in the county.
2. For all calendar years prior to the first day of
January of the year following receipt of software necessary

SB 1784 23
for the implementation of the requirements provided under
subsections 3 and 4 of this section from the state tax
commission, whenever any assessor shall increase the
valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith
notify the record owner on or before June fifteenth of the
previous assessed value and such increase either in person,
or by mail directed to the last known address and include on
the face of such notice, in no less than twelve-point font,
the following statement:
NOTICE TO TAXPAYER: IF YOUR ASSESSED VALUE
HAS INCREASED, IT MAY INCREASE YOUR REAL
PROPERTY TAXES WHICH ARE DUE DECEMBER THIRTY-
FIRST. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE THAT THE VALUE OF
YOUR PROPERTY HAS INCREASED, YOU MUST CHALLENGE
THE VALUE ON OR BEFORE ______ (INSERT DATE BY
WHICH APPEAL MUST BE FILED) BY CONTACTING YOUR
COUNTY ASSESSOR.
3. Effective January first of the year following
receipt of software necessary for the implementation of the
requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 4
of this section from the state tax commission, if an
assessor increases the valuation of any real property, the
assessor, on or before June fifteenth, shall notify the
record owner of the increase and, in a year of general
reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of
the projected tax liability likely to result from such an
increase either in person or by mail directed to the last
known address, and, if the address of the owner is unknown,
notice shall be given by publication in two newspapers
published in the county. Notice of the projected tax
liability from the county shall accompany the notice of
increased valuation from the assessor.

SB 1784 24
4. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsection 3 of this section, from the county shall
include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
5. Whenever any assessor shall notify a record owner
of any increase in assessed value as required by subsection
3 of this section, such assessor shall provide notice that
information regarding the specific assessment method and the
basis of the computation of value for such property is
available on the assessor's website and shall provide the

SB 1784 25
exact website address at which such information may be
accessed. Such notification shall provide the assessor's
contact information to enable taxpayers without internet
access to request and receive information regarding the
assessment method and computation of value for such
taxpayers' property. If any third-party documents, reports,
or other data were relied upon by the assessor in the
computation of assessed value, the same shall be disclosed
to the record owner on the assessor's website.
138.010. 1. Except as otherwise provided by law, in
every county in this state there shall be a county board of
equalization consisting of the commissioners of the county
commission, the county assessor as a nonvoting member, the
county surveyor, and the county clerk who shall be secretary
of the board without a vote. The county commissioners shall
also appoint two additional members to the board who shall
be citizens of the county, but not officers of the county
and, for such additional members appointed after August 28,
2007, not related to any member of the county board of
equalization within the third degree of consanguinity, who
shall have some level of experience as determined by the
county commission as a real estate broker, real estate
appraiser, home builder, property developer, lending
officer, or investor in real estate before such member's
appointment to the board. The assessor or a member of the
assessor's staff shall be present at all board of
equalization hearings, and shall have the right to present
evidence pertaining to any assessment matter before the
board.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
this board shall meet at the office of the county clerk on
the third Monday of July of each year.

SB 1784 26
3. Upon a finding by the board that it is necessary in
order to fairly hear all cases arising from a general
reassessment, the board may begin meeting after July first
in any applicable year to timely consider any appeal or
complaint resulting from an evaluation made during a general
reassessment of all taxable real property and possessory
interests in the county.
4. Any cases arising from general reassessment
involving property whose assessed valuation increased at
least fifteen percent from the previous assessment, unless
such increase is due to new construction or improvement,
that were not heard and acted upon by the board of
equalization by September thirtieth in any applicable year
shall be dismissed, the assessor's increased assessed
valuation shall be void in its entirety, and the previous
assessed valuation shall be applied to the property in place
of the increased assessed valuation. A dismissal of a case
under this section shall not preclude any taxpayer from an
appeal to the state tax commission of his or her assessment
within thirty days of the date of dismissal.
138.060. 1. (1) The county board of equalization
shall, in a summary way, determine all appeals from the
valuation of property made by the assessor, and shall
correct and adjust the assessment accordingly. There shall
be no presumption that the assessor's valuation is correct.
(2) In any county with a charter form of government
with a population greater than two hundred eighty thousand
inhabitants but less than two hundred eighty-five thousand
inhabitants, in any county with a charter form of government
with greater than one million inhabitants, in any city not
within a county, and in any other county for any property
whose assessed valuation increased at least fifteen percent

SB 1784 27
from the previous assessment unless the increase is due to
new construction or improvement, the assessor shall have the
burden to prove that the assessor's valuation does not
exceed the true market value of the subject property. In
such county or city, in the event a physical inspection of
the subject property is required by subsection 10 of section
137.115, the assessor shall have the burden to establish the
manner in which the physical inspection was performed and
shall have the burden to prove that the physical inspection
was performed in accordance with section 137.115. In such
county or city, in the event the assessor fails to provide
sufficient evidence to establish that the physical
inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115,
the property owner shall prevail on the appeal as a matter
of law, the assessor's increased assessed valuation shall be
void in its entirety, and the previous assessed valuation
shall be applied to the property in place of the increased
assessed valuation.
(3) At any hearing before the state tax commission or
a court of competent jurisdiction of an appeal of assessment
from a first class charter county or a city not within a
county, the assessor shall not advocate nor present evidence
advocating a valuation higher than that value finally
determined by the assessor or the value determined by the
board of equalization, whichever is higher, for that
assessment period.
2. The county clerk shall keep an accurate record of
the proceedings and orders of the board, and the assessor
shall correct all erroneous assessments, and the clerk shall
adjust the tax book according to the orders of such board
and the orders of the state tax commission, except that in
adding or deducting such percent to each tract or parcel of

SB 1784 28
real estate as required by such board or state tax
commission, [he] the clerk shall add or deduct in each case
any fractional sum of less than fifty cents, so that the
value of any separate tract shall contain no fractions of a
dollar.
3. If a taxpayer submits a written appraisal report
prepared by a Missouri appraiser certified by the Missouri
real estate appraisers commission to the board of
equalization at least five days prior to the hearing date
scheduled by the board of equalization to hear the
taxpayer's appeal, the value of the property determined in
the appraisal report shall presumptively determine the
property's true value in money unless the assessor produces
substantial and persuasive evidence as to why such value
should not be adopted by the board of equalization.
138.135. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the county assessor of any county of
the first classification with a population of at least nine
hundred thousand inhabitants shall not be a member of the
county board of equalization.
2. In any county of the first classification with a
population of at least nine hundred thousand inhabitants,
when there is an order of the board of equalization or the
state tax commission, including a settlement order, relating
to the assessment of property, the assessment shall remain
the same for the subsequent even-numbered year unless there
has been new construction or property improvements between
January first of the odd-numbered year and January first of
the following even-numbered year. However, in the event of
a transfer of ownership of real property on or after January
first of an even-numbered year, the new owner shall be
entitled to appeal the assessed value directly to the state

SB 1784 29
tax commission by no later than December thirty-first of the
same year, even if the prior owner appealed the value in the
previous odd-numbered year and the appeal resulted in an
order of the board of equalization or state tax commission.
In any such appeal by a new owner, the state tax commission
shall have authority to lower the assessed value for the
even-numbered year.
3. In any county of the first classification with a
population of at least nine hundred thousand inhabitants,
when a hearing is conducted by the board of equalization
pursuant to this chapter, if the property owner requests to
be heard by a majority of the board of equalization, and a
majority of the board of equalization is not in attendance
for any reason, the position of the property owner shall
prevail without further action.
138.390. 1. The state tax commission shall equalize
the valuation of real and tangible personal property among
the several counties in the state in the following manner:
with the abstracts of all the taxable property in the
several counties of the state and the abstracts of the sales
of real estate in such counties as returned by the
respective county clerks and the assessor of the city of St.
Louis, the commission shall classify all real estate situate
in cities, towns, and villages, as town lots, and all other
real estate as farming lands, and shall classify all
tangible personal property as follows: banking
corporations, railroad corporations, street railroad
corporations, all other corporations, horses, mares and
geldings, mules, asses and jennets, neat cattle, sheep,
swine, goats, domesticated small animals and all other
livestock, poultry, power machinery, farm implements, other
tangible personal property.

SB 1784 30
2. The state tax commission shall equalize the
valuation of each class or subclass of property thereof
among the respective counties of the state in the following
manner:
(1) It shall add to the valuation of each class,
subclass, or portion thereof of the property, real or
tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be
valued below its real value in money such amount or percent
as will increase the same in each case to its true value;
(2) It shall deduct from the valuation of each class,
subclass, or portion thereof of the property, real or
tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be
valued above its real value in money such amount or percent
as will reduce the same in each case to its true value.
3. When the state tax commission equalizes the
valuation of a class or subclass of property that results in
an increase of more than fifteen percent in a single tax
year, such increase shall be evenly divided between each of
the next successive reassessment cycles in a manner that
does not cause an increase of more than fifteen percent for
any two-year reassessment period. For the purposes of
implementing this subsection, the county assessor and
collector shall apply a credit to a taxpayer's property tax
bill in an amount that causes the taxpayer's real property
tax liability to increase by no more than fifteen percent
for any two-year reassessment period.
138.430. 1. Every owner of real property or tangible
personal property shall have the right to appeal from the
local boards of equalization to the state tax commission
under rules prescribed by the state tax commission, within
the time prescribed in this chapter or thirty days following
the final action of the local board of equalization,

SB 1784 31
whichever date later occurs, concerning all questions and
disputes involving the assessment against such property, the
correct valuation to be placed on such property, the method
or formula used in determining the valuation of such
property, or the assignment of a discriminatory assessment
to such property. The commission shall investigate all such
appeals and shall correct any assessment or valuation which
is shown to be unlawful, unfair, improper, arbitrary or
capricious. Any person aggrieved by the decision of the
commission may seek review as provided in chapter 536.
2. In order to investigate such appeals, the
commission may inquire of the owner of the property or of
any other party to the appeal regarding any matter or issue
relevant to the valuation, subclassification or assessment
of the property. The commission may make its decision
regarding the assessment or valuation of the property based
solely upon its inquiry and any evidence presented by the
parties to the commission, or based solely upon evidence
presented by the parties to the commission.
3. Every owner of real property or tangible personal
property shall have the right to appeal to the circuit court
of the county in which the collector maintains [his] the
collector's office from the decision of the local board of
equalization not later than thirty days after the final
decision of the board of equalization concerning all
questions and disputes involving the exclusion or exemption
of such property from assessment or from the tax rolls
pursuant to the Constitution of the United States or the
constitution or laws of this state, or of the taxable situs
of such property. The appeal shall be as a trial de novo in
the manner prescribed for nonjury civil proceedings. Upon
the timely filing of the appeal, the clerk of the circuit

SB 1784 32
court shall send to the county collector to whom the taxes
on the property involved would be due a notice that an
appeal seeking exemption has been filed, which notice shall
contain the name of the taxpayer, the case number assigned
by the court, and the parcel or locator number of the
property being appealed. The notice to the collector shall
state that the taxes in dispute are to be impounded in
accordance with subsection 2 of section 139.031.
4. Upon the timely filing of an appeal to the state
tax commission as provided in this section, or the transfer
of an appeal to the commission in accordance with subsection
5 of this section, the commission shall send to the county
collector to whom the taxes on the property involved would
be due a notice that an appeal has been filed or transferred
as the case may be, which notice shall contain the name of
the taxpayer filing the appeal, the appeal number assigned
by the commission, the parcel or locator number of the
property being appealed, the assessed value by the board of
equalization and the assessed value proposed by the
taxpayer, if such values have been provided to the
commission when the appeal is filed. The notice to the
collector shall state that the taxes in dispute are to be
impounded in accordance with subsection 2 of section
139.031. Notice to the collector of an appeal filed in an
odd-numbered year shall also serve as notice to the
collector to impound taxes for the following even-numbered
year if no decision has been rendered in the appeal. The
state tax commission shall notify the collector once a
decision has been rendered in an appeal.
5. If the circuit court, after review of the appeal,
finds that the appeal is not a proper subject for the appeal
to the circuit court as provided in subsection 3 of this

SB 1784 33
section, it shall transfer the appeal to the state tax
commission for consideration.
6. If an assessor classifies real property under a
classification that is contrary to or in conflict with a
determination by the state tax commission or a court of
competent jurisdiction of said property, the taxpayer shall
be awarded costs of appeal and reasonable attorney's fees on
a challenge of the assessor's determination.
7. If an assessor appeals the decision of the state
tax commission to a court of competent jurisdiction on any
grounds other than overvaluation and the taxpayer is the
prevailing party, the taxpayer shall be awarded costs of
appeal and reasonable attorney's fees, whether paid directly
by the taxpayer or paid by an attorney, tax agent, or other
third party.
138.434. In any [first class] charter county or a city
not within a county [may require by ordinance or charter the
reimbursement to], a taxpayer [for the amount of just and
reasonable appraisal costs, attorney fees and court costs]
shall be entitled to an award of all attorney's fees and
costs of litigation resulting from an evidentiary hearing
before the state tax commission or a court of competent
jurisdiction including, but not limited to, attorney's fees,
appraisal costs, witness fees, and court costs, whether paid
directly by the taxpayer or paid by an attorney, tax agent,
or other third party, if such appeal results in a final
decision reducing the appraised value of residential
property by at least fifteen percent or the appraised value
of utility, industrial railroad and other subclass three
property by at least twenty-five percent from the appraised
value determined by the board of equalization for that tax
year. The commission or court awarding such fees and costs

SB 1784 34
shall consider the reasonableness of the fees and costs
within the context of the particular case. Such fees and
costs shall not exceed [one] five thousand dollars for a
residential property appeal. Such fees and costs for
utility, industrial railroad or other subclass three
property appeals shall not exceed the lesser of [four] five
thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the tax savings
resulting from the appeal. The provisions of this section
shall only apply to the first contested year when cases are
tried on a consolidated basis.
139.031. 1. Any taxpayer may protest all or any part
of any current taxes assessed against the taxpayer, except
taxes collected by the director of revenue of Missouri. Any
such taxpayer desiring to pay any current taxes under
protest or while paying taxes based upon a disputed
assessment shall[, at the time of paying such taxes,] make
full payment of the current tax bill before the delinquency
date and file with the collector before the delinquency date
a written statement setting forth the grounds on which the
protest is based. The statement shall include the true
value in money claimed by the taxpayer if disputed. An
appeal before the state tax commission shall not be
dismissed on the grounds that a taxpayer failed to file a
written statement when paying taxes based upon a disputed
assessment.
2. Upon receiving [payment of current taxes under]
written notice of protest under subsection 1 of this section
or upon receiving from the state tax commission or the
circuit court notice of an appeal from the state tax
commission or the circuit court under section 138.430,
[along with] and full payment of the current tax bill before
the delinquency date, the collector shall disburse to the

SB 1784 35
proper official all portions of taxes not protested or not
disputed by the taxpayer and shall impound in a separate
fund all portions of such taxes which are protested or in
dispute. Every taxpayer protesting the payment of current
taxes under subsection 1 of this section shall, within
ninety days after filing [his] such taxpayer's protest,
commence an action against the collector by filing a
petition for the recovery of the amount protested in the
circuit court of the county in which the collector maintains
[his] the collector's office. If any taxpayer so protesting
[his] such taxpayer's taxes under subsection 1 of this
section shall fail to commence an action in the circuit
court for the recovery of the taxes protested within the
time prescribed in this subsection, such protest shall
become null and void and of no effect, and the collector
shall then disburse to the proper official the taxes
impounded, and any interest earned thereon, as provided
above in this subsection.
3. No action against the collector shall be commenced
by any taxpayer who has, effective for the current tax year,
filed with the state tax commission or the circuit court a
timely and proper appeal of the assessment of the taxpayer's
property. The portion of taxes in dispute from an appeal of
an assessment shall be impounded in a separate fund and the
commission in its decision and order issued under chapter
138 or the circuit court in its judgment may order all or
any part of such taxes refunded to the taxpayer, or may
authorize the collector to release and disburse all or any
part of such taxes.
4. Trial of the action for recovery of taxes protested
under subsection 1 of this section in the circuit court
shall be in the manner prescribed for nonjury civil

SB 1784 36
proceedings, and, after determination of the issues, the
court shall make such orders as may be just and equitable to
refund to the taxpayer all or any part of the current taxes
paid under protest, together with any interest earned
thereon, or to authorize the collector to release and
disburse all or any part of the impounded taxes, and any
interest earned thereon, to the appropriate officials of the
taxing authorities. Either party to the proceedings may
appeal the determination of the circuit court.
5. All the county collectors of taxes, and the
collector of taxes in any city not within a county, shall,
upon written application of a taxpayer, refund or credit
against the taxpayer's tax liability in the following
taxable year and subsequent consecutive taxable years until
the taxpayer has received credit in full for any real or
personal property tax mistakenly or erroneously levied
against the taxpayer and collected in whole or in part by
the collector. Such application shall be filed within three
years after the tax is mistakenly or erroneously paid. The
governing body, or other appropriate body or official of the
county or city not within a county, shall make available to
the collector funds necessary to make refunds under this
subsection by issuing warrants upon the fund to which the
mistaken or erroneous payment has been credited, or
otherwise.
6. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on any money
paid in by the taxpayer erroneously.
7. All protested taxes impounded under protest under
subsection 1 of this section and all disputed taxes
impounded under notice as required by section 138.430 shall
be invested by the collector in the same manner as assets
specified in section 30.260 for investment of state moneys.

SB 1784 37
A taxpayer who is entitled to a refund of protested or
disputed taxes shall also receive the interest earned on the
investment thereof. If the collector is ordered to release
and disburse all or part of the taxes paid under protest or
dispute to the proper official, such taxes shall be
disbursed along with the proportional amount of interest
earned on the investment of the taxes due the particular
taxing authority.
8. Any taxing authority may request to be notified by
the county collector of current taxes paid under protest.
Such request shall be in writing and submitted on or before
February first next following the delinquent date of current
taxes paid under protest or disputed, and the county
100 collector shall provide such information on or before March
101 first of the same year to the requesting taxing authority of
102 the taxes paid under protest and disputed taxes which would
103 be received by such taxing authority if the funds were not
104 the subject of a protest or dispute. Any taxing authority
105 may apply to the circuit court of the county or city not
106 within a county in which a collector has impounded protested
107 or disputed taxes under this section and, upon a
108 satisfactory showing that such taxing authority would
109 receive such impounded tax funds if they were not the
110 subject of a protest or dispute and that such taxing
111 authority has the financial ability and legal capacity to
112 repay such impounded tax funds in the event a decision
113 ordering a refund to the taxpayer is subsequently made, the
114 circuit court shall order, pendente lite, the disbursal of
115 all or any part of such impounded tax funds to such taxing
116 authority. The circuit court issuing an order under this
117 subsection shall retain jurisdiction of such matter for
118 further proceedings, if any, to compel restitution of such

SB 1784 38
119 tax funds to the taxpayer. In the event that any protested
120 or disputed tax funds refunded to a taxpayer were disbursed
121 to a taxing authority under this subsection instead of being
122 held and invested by the collector under subsection 7 of
123 this section, the taxpayer shall be entitled to interest on
124 all refunded tax funds, from the date that the disputed
125 taxes were distributed to a taxing authority through the
126 date of the refund, at the [annual rate] rates calculated by
127 the state treasurer and applied by the director of revenue
128 under section 32.068. This measure of interest shall only
129 apply to protested or disputed tax funds actually
130 distributed to a taxing authority pursuant to this
131 subsection. In the event of a refund of protested or
132 disputed tax funds which remain impounded by the collector,
133 the taxpayer shall instead be entitled to the interest
134 actually earned on those refunded impounded tax funds under
135 subsection 7 of this section. Any sovereign or official
136 immunity otherwise applicable to the taxing authorities is
137 hereby waived for all purposes related to this subsection,
138 and the taxpayer is expressly authorized to seek an order
139 enforcing this provision from the circuit court that
140 originally ordered the distribution of the protested or
141 disputed funds, or directly from the state tax commission,
142 if the tax appeal that resulted in the refund was heard and
143 determined by the state tax commission.
144 9. No appeal filed from the circuit court's or state
145 tax commission's determination pertaining to the amount of
146 refund shall stay any order of refund, but the decision
147 filed by any court of last review modifying that
148 determination shall be binding on the parties, and the
149 decision rendered shall be complied with by the party
150 affected by any modification within ninety days of the date

SB 1784 39
151 of such decision. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on
152 any additional award of refund, and the collector shall not
153 receive any interest on any ordered return of refund in
154 whole or in part. In the event that a taxpayer is entitled
155 to a refund, the collector shall issue the refund to the
156 taxpayer within thirty days of the date that the circuit
157 court's or state tax commission's determination establishing
158 the amount of the refund becomes final, and if the collector
159 does not issue the refund within thirty days, the taxpayer
160 shall be entitled to interest on the refund at the rate
161 established by the director of revenue under section 32.065
162 for the period of time after the expiration of the thirty
163 days until the refund is issued, in addition to all other
164 interest due to the taxpayer under this section.
✓